Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Alaska Historic Preservation Act.

Collateral references. —

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance protecting historical landmarks. 18 ALR4th 990.

Sec. 41.35.010.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state to preserve and protect the historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources of Alaska from loss, desecration, and destruction so that the scientific, historic, and cultural heritage embodied in these resources may pass undiminished to future generations.
To this end, the legislature finds and declares that the historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources of the state are properly the subject of concerted and coordinated efforts exercised on behalf of the general welfare of the public in order that these resources may be located, preserved, studied, exhibited, and evaluated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971)

Sec. 41.35.020.
Title to historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources; local display.

The state reserves to itself title to all historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources situated on land owned or controlled by the state, including tideland and submerged land, and reserves to itself the exclusive right of field archeology on state-owned or controlled land. However, nothing in AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

diminishes the cultural rights and responsibilities of persons of aboriginal descent or infringes upon their right of possession and use of those resources that may be considered of historic, prehistoric, or archeological value.

Although title to historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources is in the state, local cultural groups may obtain from the state, or retain, for study or display, artifacts and other items of these resources from their respective cultures or areas if the commission created in AS

41.35.300

finds that (1) the group has a durable building with weatherproof and fireproof construction and humidity control and other factors necessary to serve as a museum which will assure safe preservation of the items, (2) the item sought to be obtained is not one for which there is an undue risk of damage during transportation, and (3) the item sought to be obtained or retained is not one requiring special treatment or care beyond the ability or means of the group requesting it. A group retaining such an item or obtaining one from the state shall house it in the museum building and shall make every reasonable effort to assure its safe preservation. If the commission finds that a local cultural group is not properly taking care of an item the group shall return it to the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 83 § 4 (1993))

Administrative Code. —

For procedure, see 11 AAC 16, art. 1.

Sec. 41.35.030.
Designation of monuments and historic sites.

Upon the recommendation of the commission, the governor may declare by public order any particular historic, prehistoric, or archeological structure, deposit, site, or other object of scientific or historic interest that is situated on land owned or controlled by the state to be a state monument or historic site, and the governor may designate as a part of the monument or site as much land as is considered necessary for the proper access, care, and management of the object or site to be protected. When an object or site is situated on land held in private ownership, it may be declared a state monument or historic site in the same manner, with the written consent of the owner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 83 § 5 (1993))

Sec. 41.35.040.
Administration and financial support of monuments and historic sites.

State-owned monuments, sites, and other historic, prehistoric, or archeological properties owned or purchased by the state are under the control of the department, and their maintenance shall be covered in the appropriations made to the department.
Privately owned state monuments or historic sites are eligible to receive state support for their maintenance, restoration, and rehabilitation if they are kept accessible to the general public and application for support is made in conformity with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure, see 11 AAC 16, art. 1.

Sec. 41.35.045.
Fees for guided tours through historical sites. [Repealed, § 3 ch 89 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 41.35.050.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure, see 11 AAC 16, art. 1.

For national register of historic places, see 11 AAC 16, art. 2.

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 41.35.060.
Power to acquire historic, prehistoric, or archeological properties.

The department, with the recommendation of the commission, may acquire real and personal properties that have statewide historic, prehistoric, or archeological significance by gift, purchase, devise, or bequest. The department shall preserve and administer property so acquired. The department may acquire property adjacent to the property having historic, prehistoric, or archeological significance when it is determined to be necessary for the proper use and administration of the significant property.

If an historic, prehistoric, or archeological property which has been found by the department, upon the recommendation of the commission, to be important for state ownership is in danger of being sold or used so that its historic, prehistoric, or archeological value will be destroyed or seriously impaired, or is otherwise in danger of destruction or serious impairment, the department may establish the use of the property in a manner necessary to preserve its historic, prehistoric, or archeological character or value. If the owner of the property does not wish to follow the restrictions of the department, the department may acquire the property by eminent domain under AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 83 § 6 (1993))

Sec. 41.35.070.
Preservation of historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources threatened by public construction.

The department shall locate, identify, and preserve in suitable records information regarding historic, prehistoric, and archeological sites, locations, and remains. The information shall be submitted to the heads of the executive departments of the state.

Before public construction or public improvement of any nature is undertaken by the state, or by a governmental agency of the state or by a private person under contract with or licensed by the state or governmental agency of the state, the department may survey the affected area to determine if the area contains historic, prehistoric, or archeological values.

If the department determines that historic, prehistoric, or archeological sites, locations, or remains will be adversely affected by the public construction or improvement, the proposed public construction or improvement may not be commenced until the department has performed the necessary investigation, recording, and salvage of the site, location, or remains. All investigation, recording, and salvage work shall be performed as expeditiously as possible so that no state construction project will be unduly impaired, impeded, or delayed.

If in the course of performing public construction or improvements, historic, prehistoric, or archeological sites, locations, remains, or objects are discovered, the department shall be notified and its concurrence shall be requested in continuing the construction or improvement. Upon receipt of this notice, the department shall survey the area to determine whether the area contains historic, prehistoric, or archeological data which should be preserved in the public interest. The survey shall be conducted as expeditiously as possible. If, as a result of the survey, it is determined that (1) this data exists in the area, (2) the data has exceptional historic, prehistoric, or archeological significance, and should be collected and preserved in the public interest, and (3) it is feasible to collect and preserve the data, the department shall perform the necessary work to collect and preserve the data. This work shall be performed as expeditiously as possible.

If the concurrence of the department required under (b) and (c) of this section is not obtained after 90 days from the filing of a request for its concurrence to proceed with the project, the agency or person performing the construction or improvement may apply to the governor for permission to proceed without that concurrence, and the governor may take the action the governor considers best in overruling or sustaining the department.

The costs of investigation, recording, and salvage of the site shall be reimbursed by the agency sponsoring the construction project.

Notwithstanding (a) — (f) of this section, all actions to stop any project shall first be approved in writing by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1971, “(a) — (f)” was substituted for “(a) and (f)” in subsection (g) to correct a typographical error in ch. 130, SLA 1971.

Sec. 41.35.080.
Permits.

The commissioner may issue a permit for the investigation, excavation, gathering, or removal from the natural state, of any historic, prehistoric, or archeological resources of the state.
A permit may be issued only to persons or organizations qualified to make the investigations, excavations, gatherings, or removals and only if the results of these authorized activities will be made available to the general public through institutions and museums interested in disseminating knowledge on the subjects involved.
If the historic, prehistoric, or archeological resource involved is one which is, or is located on a site which is, sacred, holy, or of religious significance to a cultural group, the consent of that cultural group must be obtained before a permit may be issued under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1974)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure, see 11 AAC 16, art. 1.

Sec. 41.35.090.
Notice required of private persons.

Before any construction, alteration, or improvement of any nature is undertaken on a privately owned, officially designated state monument or historic site by any person, the person shall give the department three months notice of intention to construct on, alter, or improve it.
Before the expiration of the three-month notification period, the department shall either begin eminent domain proceedings under AS

41.35.060(b)

or undertake or permit the recording and salvaging of any historic, prehistoric, or archeological information considered necessary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 112 SLA 1974)

Sec. 41.35.100.
Excavation and removal of historic, prehistoric, or archeological remains on private land.

Before any historic, prehistoric, or archeological remains are excavated or removed from private land by the department, the written approval of the owner shall first be secured.
When the value of the private land is diminished by the excavation or removal, the owner of the land shall be compensated for the loss at a monetary sum mutually agreed on by the department and the owner or at a monetary sum set by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 112 SLA 1974)

Secs. 41.35.110 — 41.35.190.
Historic sites advisory committee. [Repealed, E.O. No. 83, § 20 (1993).]

Sec. 41.35.200.
Unlawful acts.

A person may not appropriate, excavate, remove, injure, or destroy, without a permit from the commissioner, any historic, prehistoric, or archeological resources of the state.

A person may not possess, sell, buy, or transport within the state, or offer to sell, buy, or transport within the state, historic, prehistoric, or archeological resources taken or acquired in violation of this section or 16 U.S.C. 433.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 83 SLA 2001.]

An historic, prehistoric, or archeological resource that is taken in violation of this section shall be seized by any person designated in AS

41.35.220

wherever found and at any time. Objects seized may be disposed of as the commissioner determines by deposit in the proper public depository.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 8 ch 112 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For crimes involving cemeteries, tombs, graves, and memorials, see AS

11.46.482

.

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 41.35.210.
Criminal penalties.

A person who is convicted of violating a provision of AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 41.35.215.
Civil penalties.

In addition to other penalties and remedies provided by law, a person who violates a provision of AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

is subject to a maximum civil penalty of $100,000 for each violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 1988)

Sec. 41.35.220.
Enforcement authority.

The following persons are peace officers of the state and shall enforce AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

:

an employee of the department authorized by the commissioner;

a peace officer in the state;

any other person authorized by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971)

Cross references. —

For definition of “peace officer,” see AS

01.10.060

.

Sec. 41.35.230.
Definitions.

In AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commission” means the Alaska Historical Commission established in AS

41.35.300

;

“historic, prehistoric, and archeological resources” includes deposits, structures, ruins, sites, buildings, graves, artifacts, fossils, or other objects of antiquity which provide information pertaining to the historical or prehistorical culture of people in the state as well as to the natural history of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971; am § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 83 § 7 (1993))

Cross references. —

For additional definitions, see AS

41.99.900

.

Sec. 41.35.240.
Short title.

AS

41.35.010

—

41.35.240

may be cited as the Alaska Historic Preservation Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1971)